Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1208.02
Practice of emergency medical care, defined.

Practice of emergency medical care means the performance of any act using judgment or skill based upon the United States Department of Transportation education standards and guideline training requirements, the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration's National Emergency Medical Service Scope of Practice Model and National Emergency Medical Services Education Standards, an education program for a community paramedic or a critical care paramedic that is approved by the board and the Department of Health and Human Services, and permitted practices and procedures for the level of licensure listed in section 38-1217. Such acts include the identification of and intervention in actual or potential health problems of individuals and are directed toward addressing such problems based on actual or perceived traumatic or medical circumstances. Such acts are provided under therapeutic regimens ordered by a physician medical director or through protocols as provided by the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act.

Laws 2018, LB1034, § 17;

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 23.